Washington statutes.
RCW 35.60.050

Authorization to appropriate funds and levy taxes.

The governing bodies having power to appropriate moneys within such municipalities for the purpose of purchasing, leasing or otherwise acquiring property, constructing, improving, maintaining, and equipping buildings or other structures, and the investigations, planning, operation or maintenance necessary to participation in any such world fair or exposition, are hereby authorized to appropriate and cause to be raised by taxation or otherwise in such municipalities, moneys sufficient to carry out such purpose.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.60.050. Prior: 1961 c 149 s 5; prior: 1961 c 39 s 5.]